Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 36A Temporary Health Care Placement Decision Maker for an Adult

Law reviews.

For article, “Medical Decision-Making in Georgia,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (2005).

31-36A-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Temporary Health Care Placement Decision Maker for an Adult Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5.

31-36A-2.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly recognizes that there may be occasions when an adult has not made advance arrangements for a situation when he or she is unable to consent to his or her own admission to or discharge from one health care facility or placement or transfer to another health care facility or placement. Under these circumstances, the General Assembly further recognizes that it may be necessary and in the adult’s best interest to be admitted to or discharged from one health care facility or placement or transferred to an alternative facility or placement.

In recognition of the findings in subsection (a) of this Code section, the General Assembly declares that the laws of the State of Georgia shall provide for the most appropriate placement available for these individuals and shall declare an order of priority for those persons who may make the decision to transfer, admit, or discharge such adults at the appointed times and a procedure for obtaining authorization from the court in the absence of a person authorized to consent.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5.

31-36A-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Absence of a person authorized to consent” means that:

After diligent efforts for a reasonable period of time, no person authorized to consent under the provisions of Code Section 31-36A-6 has been located; or

All such authorized persons located have affirmatively waived their authority to consent or dissent to admission to or discharge from a health care facility or placement or transfer to an alternative health care facility or placement, provided that dissent by an authorized person to a proposed admission, discharge, or transfer shall not be deemed waiver of authority.

(1.1)

“Psychiatric advance directive” means a written document voluntarily executed by an individual in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-11-9.

“Unable to consent” means that an adult is unable to:

Make rational and competent decisions regarding his or her placement options for health or personal care; or

Communicate such decisions by any means.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-18/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (1.1).

31-36A-4.
Construction of chapter in relation to Title 37.

This chapter shall not apply to involuntary examination and hospitalization for treatment of mental illness, which shall continue to be governed by Title 37.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5.

31-36A-5.
Certification by physician.

An attending physician, treating physician, or other physician licensed according to the laws of the State of Georgia, after having personally examined an adult, may certify in the adult’s medical records the following:

The adult is unable to consent for himself or herself; and

It is the physician’s belief that it is in the adult’s best interest to be discharged from a hospital, institution, medical center, or other health care institution providing health or personal care for treatment of any type of physical or mental condition and to be transferred to or admitted to an alternative facility or placement, including, but not limited to, nursing facilities, assisted living communities, personal care homes, rehabilitation facilities, and home and community based programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 21/SB 178.

31-36A-6.
Persons authorized to consent; expiration of authorization; limitations on authority to consent; effect on other laws; immunity from liability or disciplinary action.

Upon a physician’s certification pursuant to Code Section 31-36A-5, and in addition to such other persons as may be otherwise authorized and empowered, any one of the following persons is authorized and empowered to consent, in the priority order listed below, either orally or otherwise, to such transfer, admission, or discharge:

Any adult, for himself or herself;

Any person authorized to give such consent for the adult under an advance directive for health care, psychiatric advance directive, or durable power of attorney for health care under Chapter 32 of this title;

Any guardian of the person for his or her ward;

Any spouse for his or her spouse;

Any adult child for such person’s parent;

Any parent for such person’s adult child;

Any adult for such person’s adult brother or sister;

Any grandparent for such person’s adult grandchild;

Any adult grandchild for such person’s grandparent;

Any adult uncle or aunt for such person’s adult nephew or niece; or

Any adult nephew or niece for such person’s adult uncle or aunt.

Any person authorized and empowered to consent under subsection (a) of this Code section shall, after being informed of the provisions of this Code section, act in good faith to consent to a transfer, admission, or discharge which the patient would have wanted had the patient been able to consent in the circumstances under which such transfer, admission, or discharge is considered or, if the patient’s preferences are unknown, which such person believes the patient would have wanted had the patient been able to consent in the circumstances under which such transfer, admission, or discharge is considered. The current health care facility’s discharge planner, social worker, or other designated personnel shall assist the person authorized to consent under subsection (a) of this Code section with identifying the most appropriate, least restrictive level of care available, including home and community based services and available placements, if any, in reasonable proximity to the patient’s residence.

The authorization to consent to such transfer, admission, or discharge shall expire upon the earliest of the following:

The completion of the transfer, admission, or discharge and such responsibilities associated with such transfer, admission, or discharge, including, but not limited to, assisting with applications for financial coverage and insurance benefits for health or personal care;

Upon a physician’s certification that the adult is able to consent to decisions regarding his or her placements for health or personal care; or

Upon discovery that another person authorized under subsection (a) of this Code section of a higher priority is available who has not affirmatively waived his or her authority to consent or dissent to admission to or discharge from a health care facility or placement or transfer to an alternative health care facility or placement, provided that dissent by such authorized person to a proposed admission, discharge, or transfer shall not be deemed waiver of authority.

The authorization to give consent for transfer, admission, or discharge is limited solely to said transfer, admission, or discharge decision and responsibilities associated with such decision, including providing assistance with financial assistance applications. It does not include the power or authority to perform any other acts on behalf of the adult not expressly authorized in this Code section.

This Code section shall not repeal, abrogate, or impair the operation of any other laws, either federal or state, governing the transfer, admission, or discharge of a person to or from a health care facility or placement. Further, the adult retains all rights provided under laws, both federal and state, as a result of an involuntary transfer, admission, or discharge.

Each certifying physician, discharge planner, social worker, or other hospital personnel or authorized person who acts in good faith pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall not be subject to any civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 14/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-19/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “, psychiatric advance directive,” in paragraph (a)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Marriage, Death and Taxes:
The Estate Planning Impact of Windsor and Obergefell on Georgia’s Same Sex Spouses,” see 21 Ga. St. Bar. J. 9 (Oct. 2015).

31-36A-7.
Petition for order by healthcare facility; issuance, expiration, and limited authorization of order; effect on other laws; immunity from liability or disciplinary action.

In the absence of a person authorized to consent under the provisions of Code Section 31-36A-6, any interested person or persons, including, but not limited to, any authority, corporation, partnership, or other entity operating the healthcare facility where the adult who is unable to consent is then present, with or without the assistance of legal counsel, may petition the probate court for a healthcare placement transfer, admission, or discharge order. The petition must be verified and filed in the county where the adult requiring an alternative placement or transfer, admission, or discharge resides or is found, provided that the probate court of the county where the adult is found shall not have jurisdiction to grant the order if it appears that the adult was removed to that county solely for purposes of filing such a petition. The petition shall set forth:

The name, age, address, and county of the residence of the adult, if known;

The name, address, and county of residence of the petitioner;

The relationship of the petitioner to the adult;

The current location of the adult;

A physician’s certification pursuant to Code Section 31-36A-5;

The absence of any person to consent to such transfer, admission, or discharge as authorized by the provisions of Code Section 31-36A-6;

Name and address of the recommended alternative healthcare facility or placement; and

A statement of the reasons for such transfer, admission, or discharge as required by subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section.

The petition shall be supported by the affidavit of an attending physician, treating physician, or other physician licensed according to the laws of the State of Georgia, attesting the following:

The adult is unable to consent for himself or herself;

It is the physician’s belief that it is in the adult’s best interest to be admitted to or discharged from a hospital, institution, medical center, or other healthcare institution providing health or personal care for treatment of any type of physical or mental condition or to be transferred to an alternative facility or placement, including, but not limited to, nursing facilities, assisted living communities, personal care homes, rehabilitation facilities, and home and community based programs; and

The identified type of healthcare facility or placement will provide the adult with the recommended services to meet the needs of the adult and is the most appropriate, least restrictive level of care available.

The petition shall also be supported by the affidavit of the discharging healthcare facility’s discharge planner, social worker, or other designated personnel attesting to and explaining the following:

There is an absence of a person to consent to such transfer, admission, or discharge as authorized in Code Section 31-36A-6;

The recommended alternative facility or placement is the most appropriate facility or placement available that provides the least restrictive and most appropriate level of care and reasons therefor; and

Alternative facilities or placements were considered, including home and community based placements and available placements, if any, that were in reasonable proximity to the adult’s residence.

The court shall review the petition and accompanying affidavits and other information to determine if all the necessary information is provided to the court as required in subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section. The court shall enter an instanter order if the following information is provided:

The adult is unable to consent for himself or herself;

There is an absence of any person to consent to such transfer, admission, or discharge as authorized in Code Section 31-36A-6;

It is in the adult’s best interest to be discharged from a hospital, institution, medical center, or other healthcare institution or placement providing health or personal care for treatment for any type of physical or mental condition and to be admitted or transferred to an alternative facility or placement;

The recommended alternative facility or placement is the most appropriate facility or placement available that provides the least restrictive and most appropriate level of care; and

Alternative facilities or placements were considered, including home and community based placements and available placements, if any, in reasonable proximity to the adult’s residence.

The order shall authorize the petitioner or the petitioner’s designee to do all things necessary to accomplish the discharge from a hospital, institution, medical center, or other healthcare institution and the transfer to or admission to the recommended facility or placement.

The order authorizing such transfer, admission, or discharge shall expire upon the earliest of the following:

The completion of the transfer, admission, or discharge and such responsibilities associated with such transfer, admission, or discharge, including, but not limited to, assisting with the completion of applications for financial coverage and insurance benefits for the health or personal care;

Upon a physician’s certification that the adult is able to understand and make decisions regarding his or her placements for health or personal care and can communicate such decisions by any means; or

At a time specified by the court not to exceed 30 days from the date of the order.

The order is limited to authorizing the transfer, admission, or discharge and other responsibilities associated with such decision, such as authorizing the application for financial coverage and insurance benefits. It does not include the authority to perform any other acts on behalf of the adult not expressly authorized in this Code section.

This Code section shall not repeal, abrogate, or impair the operation of any other laws, either federal or state, governing the transfer, admission, or discharge of a person to or from a healthcare facility or placement. Further, such person retains all rights provided under laws, both federal and state, as a result of an involuntary transfer, admission, or discharge.

Each certifying physician, discharge planner, social worker, or other hospital personnel or authorized person who acts in good faith pursuant to the authority of this Code section shall not be subject to any civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-36A-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 485, § 5; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 22/SB 178; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 7/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “healthcare” for “health care” throughout this Code section; deleted former subsection (e), which read: “At the same time as issuing the order, the court shall provide a copy of said order to the commissioner of public health”; and redesignated former subsections (f) through (i) as present subsections (e) through (h), respectively.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).